South Dakota, session 2026, HB1283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-5:
A nonresident, or dependent of a nonresident, who is currently serving in this state
on active duty in the armed forces of the United States may apply to the Department of
Revenue for an exemption from license fees applicable to any noncommercial automobile,
pickup truck, or van licensed in this state pursuant to § 32-5-6.
To qualify for the exemption under this section, the applicant must submit,
together with the application for registration, a copy of the military orders or other
documentation showing that the applicant is a nonresident, or the dependent of a
nonresident, who is stationed in this state while on active duty in the armed forces of the
United States.
The county treasurer shall record any exemption approved under this section and
provide the information to the Department of Revenue.
The qualifying applicant may obtain the exemption for one motor vehicle. The
exemption may be renewed annually and does not include the additional cost of any
specialty plate provided for in chapter 32-5.
Nothing in this section exempts the applicant from paying the excise tax required
in § 32-5B-1 on the purchase price of any motor vehicle.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.